Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.19
Encapsulant, defined.

Encapsulant means a substance that forms a barrier between lead-based paint and the environment using a liquid-applied coating, with or without reinforcement materials, or an adhesively bonded covering material.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 21.